North Carolina, session 2025, SB222.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 1G-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 1G-2. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Business contract. – A contract or undertaking, contingent or otherwise,
entered into primarily for business or commercial purposes. The term does not
include a consumer contract or an contract, employment contract.contract, or
government contract.
…
(4) Government contract. – A contract or undertaking, contingent or otherwise, to
which the State of North Carolina or a county, municipality, or other public
body of the State of North Carolina is a party."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to contracts
entered into, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
*S222-v-1*